Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
Article 1 Housing Authorities

Cross references.

Cooperation by cities, counties, and other governmental entities in aid of construction, operation, and other tasks of housing projects undertaken by municipal, county, and other governmental entities housing authorities, §

8-3-150

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Georgia L. 1937, p. 210, as amended, the basis for this article, has been the subject of a number of validating acts by which the General Assembly has “validated, ratified, confirmed, approved, and declared legal” the establishment and organization of housing authorities; contracts and agreements entered into by housing authorities; actions with regard to the issuance of bonds; and various other specified actions taken by housing authorities prior to the date of each such validating act. See Ga. L. 1939, p. 126, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1951, p. 127, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1959, p. 141, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1962, p. 734, §§ 1-3; and Ga. L. 1971, p. 94, § 1. None of these validating acts is codified. However, these acts have been indicated in the history citations for the sections in this article to which they appear to relate most directly. See the history citations for Code Sections

8-3-4

,

8-3-6

,

8-3-30

,

8-3-32

,

8-3-33

,

8-3-50

,

8-3-51

,

8-3-70

,

8-3-71

,

8-3-73

,

8-3-74

,

8-3-77

,

8-3-79

,

8-3-81

,

8-3-100

,

8-3-104

,

8-3-105

,

8-3-106

,

8-3-107

,

8-3-108

,

8-3-109

,

8-3-134

,

8-3-136

, and

8-3-137

. For case construing 1939 validating act (Ga. L. 1939, p. 126, §§ 1-3), see Hogg v. City of Rome,

189 Ga. 298

,

6 S.E.2d 48

(1939).

Law reviews.

For note, “The Legal Nature of Public Purpose Authorities: Governmental, Private, or Neither,” see 8 Ga. L. Rev. 680 (1974).

For article, “Tax-Exempt Financing of Section 8 Housing Projects,” see 15 Ga. St. B.J. 68 (1978).